Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.202

Comprehensive system of instruction and services in reading and early literacy.

School districts are responsible for providing a comprehensive system of instruction and services in reading and early literacy to kindergarten through fourth grade students that is based on the degree of student need for additional support. Reading and early literacy systems provided by school districts must include:

(1) Annual use of screening assessments and other tools to identify at-risk readers in kindergarten through fourth grade, such as the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills, the Washington state early learning and development guidelines for birth through third grade, the second grade reading assessment under RCW 28A.300.310, and locally used assessments and other tools; and

(2) Research-based family involvement and engagement strategies, including strategies to help families and guardians assist in improving students' reading and early literacy skills at home.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 102.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.